Utah statutes.
53A-17a-148.   Use of nonlapsing balances.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Education entity" means a school district, charter school, or the Utah Schools for the Deaf and the Blind.

(b) (i)  "New educator" means a person who:

(A)  is an educator as defined in Section 53A-17a-153;

(B)  is hired by an education entity to begin teaching during the 2008-09 school year;

(C)  did not work in this state as an educator for an education entity during the 2007-08 school year; and

(D)  has never received a signing bonus in this state.

(ii)  A new educator may include a person who is returning to education after one or more years of interrupted service.

(2)  The State Board of Education may use Minimum School Program nonlapsing balances to restore special education funding as follows:

(a)  up to $902,538 is authorized in fiscal year 2005-06; and

(b)  up to $902,538 is authorized in fiscal year 2006-07.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall allocate $5,000,000 of Minimum School Program nonlapsing balances in fiscal year 2008-09 to education entities to provide one-time signing bonuses for new educators as provided under Subsection (4), including money for the following employer-paid benefits:

(a)  retirement;

(b)  workers' compensation;

(c)  Social Security; and

(d)  Medicare.

(4) (a)  Subject to the availability of funding, education entities shall provide a one-time signing bonus of $1,000 to a new educator.

(b)  If the total cost of bonuses and employer-paid benefits under Subsection (4)(a) for all education entities exceeds $5,000,000, all bonuses shall be reduced pro rata so that the total cost does not exceed $5,000,000.

(c)  To qualify for a bonus, a new educator shall:

(i)  be hired prior to October 1, 2008; and

(ii)  work for at least 90 days for the education entity.

(5)  The State Board of Education may make rules as necessary to administer this section, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

